District of Columbia statutes.
47-391.08

Application of laws of District of Columbia to Authority.

(a)

In general. —

The following laws of the District of Columbia (as in effect on April 17, 1995) shall apply to the members and activities of the Authority:

(1)

§ 1-207.42;

(2)

§§ 2-531 through 2-536; and

(3)

§ 1-1162.23.

(b)

No control, supervision, oversight, or review by Mayor or Council. —

Neither the Mayor nor the Council may exercise any control, supervision, oversight, or review over the Authority or its activities.

(c)

Authority not subject to representation by Attorney General for the District of Columbia. —

In any action brought by or on behalf of the Authority, and in any action brought against the Authority, the Authority shall be represented by such counsel as it may select, but in no instance may the Authority be represented by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 107, Pub. L. 104-8, § 108
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(a)(3), 52 DCR 2638
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 48(h)(1), 53 DCR 6794
Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 501(n)(1), 59 DCR 1862

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-391.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-391.8.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (c), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 19-124, in subsec. (a)(3), substituted “ § 1-1162.23 ” for “§ 1-1106.01”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 401(n)(1) of Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and Comprehensive Ethics Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-298, January 29, 2012, 59 DCR 683).